Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,133
Nail technology license; display.

Every person holding a license in nail technology issued by the department under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act shall display it in a conspicuous place in his or her principal place of employment, and every nail technology establishment shall so display the then current licenses of all practitioners there employed.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 40;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,192;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 395;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 49.